Utah statutes.
53-7-506.   Attorney general may bring action at request of the state fire marshal.

The state attorney general may bring an action at the request of the state fire marshal, in the name of the state, seeking:

(1)  injunctive relief to prevent or end a violation of Section 53-7-504 or 53-7-505;

(2)  to recover civil penalties imposed under Section 53-7-504;

(3)  to obtain access for inspections under Section 53-7-505; or

(4)  to recover attorney fees and other enforcement costs.

